Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.190

Receiver's compensation.

The receiver shall be entitled to deduct from any funds coming into his or her hands a commission of six percent on the first thousand dollars, five percent on the second thousand and four percent on any amount over two thousand dollars as his or her full compensation exclusive of necessary traveling expenses and necessary disbursements, but not exclusive of attorney's fees.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2007; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.190. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 11; RRS s 8924.]